Louisiana, session 2026, HB841.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 19:2.2(A)(1)(d) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2.2. Expropriation by expropriating authorities referred to in R.S. 19:2
A. Before exercising the rights of expropriation provided by R.S. 19:2, any
expropriating authority referred to in R.S. 19:2 shall comply with the following:
(1) Provide the owner whose property is to be taken with the following
information from its appraisal or evaluation as to the amount of compensation due
the owner for the full extent of his loss:
* * *
(d) A sworn statement that the appraiser is a disinterested third party with
no monetary interest in any transaction related to the expropriation other than
undertaking a fair and accurate appraisal of the landowner's property and receiving
a reasonable fee for the appraiser's services.
* * *
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-761 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 841
Section 2. R.S. 30:1108(C)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 30:4.4 is
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4.4. Pipeline and other certificates; code of conduct
A. Any pipeline or other owner or operator issued a certificate pursuant to
this Subtitle that confers the right to expropriate property shall, in addition to any
other legal requirements, comply with the following prior to exercising that right:
(1) Provide written notice to the landowner or landowners of the intent to
acquire property or property rights. This notice shall be sent to all such property
owners whose addresses are known, unless those owners have jointly designated a
representative to receive such communications. The notice shall include:
(a) The name and contact information of the owner or operator.
(b) Identifying information regarding the certificate under which the owner
or operator has been delegated expropriating authority.
(c) Contact information for the Department of Conservation and Energy.
(d) A clear statement of the owner or operator's interest in the property.
(e) A copy of the statutory requirements the certificate holder is required to
comply with prior to initiating an expropriation proceeding.
(2) Provide the landowner or designated representative a reasonable
opportunity to be present during any inspection of the property conducted for
appraisal purposes. Regardless of whether the landowner or representative is present
during an inspection or appraisal, they shall be allowed the opportunity to provide
information to the appraiser regarding the condition and features of the property,
comparable rights of use on the subject property or nearby, and any other
information the landowner may deem relevant for valuation purposes.
(3) Engage in good faith negotiations with the landowner or their
representative as required by R.S. 19:2 et seq. Such negotiations shall include no
fewer than five in-person meetings or documented attempts to meet in person. The
in-person requirement may be satisfied with other forms of real-time communication
requested by the landowner. In the course of such negotiations, the owner or
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-761 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 841
operator shall not threaten the imposition of attorneys fees or costs in connection
with any expropriation proceeding.
(4) Submit a written offer to the landowner or their representative that
includes:
(a) The amount offered as just compensation.
(b) A legal description of the property and the specific interest to be
acquired.
(c) A list and description of any buildings or improvements located on the
property to be affected by the acquisition.
(5) Allow the landowner or their representative at least fifteen calendar days
from delivery of the written offer, or from the sender's receipt of notification of a
failed attempt to deliver the written offer by United States certified mail or
commercial courier, to respond with additional information or a counteroffer.
B. If the secretary finds, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, that any
owner or operator has failed to comply with this Section or has otherwise misused
or abused the authority delegated to them as an expropriating authority under a
certificate issued, the owner or operator shall be subject to the penalties provided for
in this Subsection.
(1) The secretary may revoke any certificate granting the owner or operator
expropriating authority.
(2)(a) Any person found to have violated this Section shall be liable to the
department for a civil penalty as follows:
(i) One thousand dollars for the first violation.
(ii) Two thousand dollars for the second violation.
(iii) Ten thousand dollars for a third or subsequent violation.
(b) The penalty shall be assessed by the secretary by written notice. The
secretary or the attorney general may bring a civil action to recover any penalties
assessed pursuant to this Paragraph.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-761 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 841
(c) Penalties collected by the department for a violation of this Section shall
be deposited into the Oil and Gas Regulatory Dedicated Fund Account pursuant to
the provisions of R.S. 30:21.
(3) The department shall maintain on its website a list of persons found to
have violated this Section.
* * *
§1108. Eminent domain; expropriation
* * *
C.(1) In addition to the requirements of Paragraph (2) of this Subsection and
any other power of eminent domain authorized by law, eminent The eminent domain
authority authorized under this Chapter shall be exercised pursuant to the procedures
found in R.S. 19:2 et seq. and R.S. 30:4.4. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
expropriation hearings conducted pursuant to this Chapter shall be heard in the parish
in which the property subject to the expropriation is situated.
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 30:1108(C)(2) is hereby repealed in its entirety.